Indiana, session 2026, HB1378.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3-3-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 11. (a) Each taxable
year, an individual who is eligible to claim the federal child and
dependent care tax credit under Section 21 of the Internal Revenue
Code is entitled to a credit against the individual's, and the
individual's spouse's in the case of a joint return, adjusted gross
income tax liability equal to:
(1) the allowable amount of the federal child and dependent
care tax credit that the taxpayer claimed on the taxpayer's
federal income tax return for the taxable year under Section
21 of the Internal Revenue Code; multiplied by
(2) twenty percent (20%).
(b) If the credit provided by this section exceeds the amount of
the individual's adjusted gross income tax liability for the taxable
year, reduced by the sum of all credits for the taxable year that are
applied before the application of the credit provided by this
2026 IN 1378—LS 6788/DI 125


section, the excess shall be refunded to the individual.
SECTION 2. IC 6-3-3-15 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 15. (a) As used in this
section, "qualifying child" has the meaning set forth in Section
24(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(b) Each taxable year, an individual is entitled to a credit
against the individual's, and the individual's spouse's in the case of
a joint return, adjusted gross income tax liability equal to:
(1) three hundred dollars ($300); multiplied by
(2) the number of qualifying children for which the taxpayer
was eligible to claim the federal child tax credit under Section
24 of the Internal Revenue Code for the taxable year.
(c) If the credit provided by this section exceeds the amount of
the individual's adjusted gross income tax liability for the taxable
year, reduced by the sum of all credits for the taxable year that are
applied before the application of the credit provided by this
section, the excess shall be refunded to the individual.
SECTION 3. IC 6-3.1-39.5-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.201-2023,
SECTION 103, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 1. As used
in this chapter, "Indiana qualified child care facility" means a facility
that is:
(1) a qualified child care facility (as defined in Section 45F of the
Internal Revenue Code);
(2) located in Indiana; and
(3) licensed by the division of family resources under IC 12-17.2.
and
(4) operated:
(A) by a taxpayer;
(B) by a taxpayer jointly with one (1) or more other individuals
or entities; or
(C) under a contract described in Section 45F(c)(1)(A)(iii) of
the Internal Revenue Code with the taxpayer.
SECTION 4. IC 6-3.1-39.5-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.201-2023,
SECTION 103, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 3. As used
in this chapter, "qualified child care expenditure" means an
expenditure:
(1) for the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, or expansion
of property used as part of an Indiana qualified child care facility
of a taxpayer that is operated for the taxpayer's employees;
2026 IN 1378—LS 6788/DI 125


(2) incurred under a contract between a taxpayer and an Indiana
qualified child care facility to provide for the acquisition,
construction, rehabilitation, or expansion of property used as part
of the Indiana qualified child care facility; or
(3) for purposes of complying with the qualified child care facility
licensure requirements under IC 12-17.2, as part of the taxpayer
acquiring or constructing an Indiana qualified child care facility;
(4) incurred for the operating costs of an Indiana qualified
child care facility of a taxpayer that is operated for the
taxpayer's employees, including costs related to training of
employees, to scholarship programs, and to provide increased
compensation to employees with higher levels of child care
training;
(5) under a contract with an Indiana qualified child care
facility to provide child care services to employees of the
taxpayer, or under a contract with an intermediate entity that
contracts with one (1) or more Indiana qualified child care
facilities for child care services; or
(6) under a contract to provide child care resources and
referral services to an employee of the taxpayer.
SECTION 5. IC 6-3.1-39.5-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.201-2023,
SECTION 103, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 5. As used
in this chapter, "recapture event" means:
(1) the cessation of the operation of the Indiana qualified child
care facility as an Indiana qualified child care facility; or
(2) subject to section 12(c) of this chapter, a change in ownership
of an Indiana qualified child care facility for which a credit was
allowed under this chapter, unless the person acquiring an interest
agrees to assume the recapture liability of the person disposing of
an interest. or
(3) the use of an Indiana qualified child care facility for the
enrollment of a child from any individual who is not an employee
of the taxpayer.
The term does not include a cessation of operation or change in
ownership due to accident or casualty.
SECTION 6. [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]
(a) IC 6-3-3-11 and IC 6-3-3-15, both as added by this act, apply to
taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.
(b) IC 6-3.1-39.5-1, IC 6-3.1-39.5-3, and IC 6-3.1-39.5-5, all as
amended by this act, apply to taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2025.
2026 IN 1378—LS 6788/DI 125


(c) This SECTION expires June 30, 2028.
SECTION 7. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1378—LS 6788/DI 125